Hawaii statutes.
§196-22 State energy projects. State
energy projects may be implemented under this chapter with the approval of the
comptroller and the director of finance or their designees. In addition, this
section shall be construed to provide the greatest possible flexibility to
agencies in structuring agreements so that economic benefits and existing
energy incentives may be used and maximized, and financing and other costs to
agencies may be minimized. The specific terms of energy performance
contracting under section 36-41 may be altered if deemed advantageous to the
agency and approved by the director of finance and the comptroller. [L 2002, c
77, pt of §9; am L 2004, c 216, §21; am L 2006, c 96, §8; am L 2007, c 157, §4]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next